07_Project/chv3ps_pal.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%>

LEXICON Root

ɐ:ɐ Root ;
ə:ə Root ;
e:e Root ;
j:j Root ;
o:o Root ;
ɘ:ɘ Root ;
i:i Root ;
u:u Root ;
y:y Root ;
ɯ:ɯ Root ;
a:a Root ;
b:b Root ;
ʋ:ʋ Root ;
ɡ:ɡ Root ;
d:d Root ;
ʒ:ʒ Root ;
z:z Root ;
k:k Root ;
l:l Root ;
m:m Root ;
n:n Root ;
p:p Root ;
ɾ:ɾ Root ;
s:s Root ;
ɕ:ɕ Root ;
t:t Root ;
f:f Root ;
χ:χ Root ;
ʃ:ʃ Root ;
ː:ː Root ;
.:. Root ;
ʲ:ʲ Root ;
# ;

ɘɕ.le:ɘɕ.le 3PersPresLowHarmony ;

ʋɘ.le.ɾe:ʋɘ.le.ɾe 3PersPresLowHarmony ;
ʋɘ.ɾe:ʋɘ.ɾe 3PersPresLowHarmony ;
ʋɘ.ɾe.ne:ʋɘ.ɾe.ne 3PersPresLowHarmony ;
ʋɘ.de:ʋɘ.de 3PersPresLowHarmony ;
ʋi.le:ʋi.le 3PersPresLowHarmony ;
ɘ.me:ɘ.me 3PersPresLowHarmony ;
ɘ.mɘt.le.ne:ɘ.mɘt.le.ne 3PersPresLowHarmony ;
ɘ.ne:ɘ.ne 3PersPresLowHarmony ;
ɘ.ne.ne:ɘ.ne.ne 3PersPresLowHarmony ;
ɘ.nen.de.ɾe:ɘ.nen.de.ɾe 3PersPresLowHarmony ;
ɘɕ.le:ɘɕ.le 3PersPresLowHarmony ;
i.le:i.le 3PersPresLowHarmony ;
il.de:il.de 3PersPresLowHarmony ;


LEXICON 3PersPresLowHarmony

t:tʲ Root ;
